Hawaii statutes.
[§11-409] Final determination of
violation; order. If the commission makes a final determination of a
violation of this part, its written decision with findings of fact and
conclusions of law may order any of the following:

(1) The return of any contribution;

(2) The reimbursement of any unauthorized
expenditure;

(3) The payment of any administrative fine to the
general fund of the State;

(4) The respondent to cease and desist violations of
this part; or

(5) Any report, statement, or other information to be
filed that may be required by this part. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next